Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1152
Expanded function dental hygienist; authorized activities.

An expanded function dental hygienist may perform all the procedures authorized for a licensed dental hygienist. Upon completion of education and testing approved by the board and with a permit from the department for the respective competency, an expanded function dental hygienist may, under the indirect supervision of a licensed dentist, place (1) restorative level one simple restorations (one surface) and (2) restorative level two complex restorations (multiple surfaces).

Laws 2017, LB18, § 22.